Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 89.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2010
83-913.01
Department
of Correctional Services Facility Cash Fund; created; how funded; investment;
disbursements; how made.

(1) There is hereby created
the Department of Correctional Services Facility Cash Fund.

Except as otherwise provided, all money derived from any
source in any facility under the supervision of the Department of Correctional
Services shall be remitted to the State Treasurer in accordance with the policies
and procedures established by the Director of Correctional Services for credit
to the fund. Transfers may
be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. Any
money in the Department of Correctional Services Facility
Cash Fund available for investment may be invested pursuant to
the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment
Act.

(2) All disbursements from the fund shall be made by the
Director of Administrative Services by warrants drawn on the fund only upon
certification of expenses by the chief executive officer of the appropriate
facility within the Department of Correctional Services and upon presentation
of proper vouchers for such expenses by the Director of Correctional Services
or his or her authorized agent.

Laws 1976, LB 869, § 1;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 68;

Laws 1994, LB 1066, § 130;

Laws 2009, First Spec. Sess., LB3, § 89.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.